Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
RENT, INSTALLMENT CONTRACTS, MORTGAGES,

LIENS,
ASSIGNMENTS, LEASES

[§657D-21] Eviction or distress during
military service; stay; penalty for noncompliance; allotment of pay for
payment. (a) No eviction or distress shall be made during the period of
military service for any premises occupied chiefly for dwelling purposes by the
spouse or other dependents of a person in military service, except upon leave
of court granted upon application or granted in an action or proceeding on the
right of possession.

(b) On any such application or in any such
action the court may, in its discretion and on its own motion, and shall, upon
application, unless in the opinion of the court the ability of the tenant to
pay the agreed rent is not materially affected by reason of such military
service, stay the proceedings for not longer than three months, or it may make
such other order as may be just. Where the stay is granted or other order is
made by the court, the owner of the premises shall be entitled, upon
application therefor, to relief in respect of the premises similar to that
granted persons in military service in sections 657D-22 and 657D-23 to such
extent and for such period as may appear to the court to be just.

(c) Any person who shall knowingly take part
in any eviction or distress otherwise than as provided in subsection (a), or
attempts so to do, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) The adjutant general is empowered, subject
to rules adopted under chapter 91, to order an allotment of the pay of a person
in military service in reasonable proportion to discharge the rent of premises
occupied for dwelling purposes by the spouse or other dependents of the person.
[L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next